Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2419.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 181.725, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7a. new text end new text begin Assistance and information for businesses; determination of worker classification. new text end new text begin A partnership entity must provide a requesting business with the information necessary to make a determination of the appropriate classification for an individual performing services for the business. Necessary information includes but is not limited to information regarding unemployment insurance, workers' compensation insurance, and tax identification numbers. The information must be provided by the partnership entity requested or provided in coordination with another partnership entity. new text end